Illinois, session 104th, HB3865.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $225,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the State Board of Education for a grant to the Chicago 7Board of Education to construct a new school facility for 8Washington High School, located at 3535 E. 114th St., Chicago, 9IL. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.